de: Kameraobjektivtyp: Kino; Extender; Fischauge; Fester Fokus; Makro; Makro-Teleobjektiv; Standard; Standardzoom; Super-Teleobjektiv; Super-Weitwinkel; Teleobjektiv; Teleobjektivzoom; Tilt/Shift; Ultra-Teleobjektivzoom; Ultra-Weitwinkel; Weit; Weitwinkelmakro; Weitwinkel-Fischauge; Weitwinkelzoom; Sonstiges
en: Camera lens type: Cinema; Extender; Fisheye; Fixed focus; Macro; Macro telephoto; Standard; Standard zoom; Super telephoto; Super wide; Telephoto; Telephoto zoom; Tilt-shift; Ultra-telephoto zoom; Ultra-wide; Wide; Wide angle macro; Wide fish-eye; Wide zoom; Other
nl: Type cameralens: Cinema; Verlenger; Fisheye; Vaste focus; Macro; Macro-telefoto; Standaard; Standaardzoom; Supertelefoto; Superbreed; Telefoto; Telezoom; Tilt-shift; Ultra-telefotozoom; Ultrabreed; Breed; Groothoekmacro; Breed vissenoog; Breed zoom; Andere
th: ประเภทเลนส์กล้อง: โรงภาพยนตร์; เลนส์ Extender; เลนส์ฟิชอาย; เลนส์แบบระยะโฟกัสคงที่; เลนส์มาโคร; เลนส์มาโครเทเลโฟโต; มาตรฐาน; เลนส์ซูมมาตรฐาน; เลนส์ซูเปอร์เทเลโฟโต; เลนส์ซูเปอร์ไวด์; เลนส์ซูเปอร์เทเลโฟโต; เลนส์ซูมเทเลโฟโต; เลนส์ Tilt-shift; เลนส์อัลตร้าซูมเทเลโฟโต; เลนส์อัลตร้าไวด์; กว้าง; เลนส์มาโครมุมกว้าง; เลนส์ฟิชอายมุมกว้าง; เลนส์ไวด์ซูม; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta objektiva za fotoaparat: Cinema; Telekonverter; Ribje oko; Fiksni fokus; Macro; Makro telefoto; Standardna; Standardna povečava; Super telefoto; Super širok; Telefoto; Telefoto povečava; Tilt-shift; Ultra-telefoto povečava; Ultra širok; Širok; Širokokotni makro; Široko ribje oko; Široka povečava; Drugo
zh-CN: 相机镜头类型: 电影; 变焦镜头; 鱼眼镜头; 定焦; 微距; 微距远摄; 标准; 标准变焦; 超远摄镜头; 超广角; 远摄镜头; 远摄变焦; 移轴; 超远摄变焦; 超广角; 宽; 广角微距; 广角鱼眼; 广角变焦; 其他
lt-LT: Fotoaparato objektyvo tipas: „Cinema“; „Extender“; „Fisheye“; Fiksuoto fokusavimo; „Macro“; „Macro telefoto“; Standartinis; Standartinis priartinimo; „Super telefoto“; „Super Wide“ plataus kampo; „Telefoto“; „Telefoto Zoom“; „Tilt-shift“; „Ultra-Telefoto Zoom“; „Ultra Wide“ plataus kampo; Plataus kampo; „Wide Angle Macro“; „Wide Fish-Eye“; „Wide Zoom“; Kita
nb: Kameraobjektiv: Kino; Forlenger; Fisheye; Fast fokus; Makro; Makro telefoto; Standard; Standard zoom; Supertelefoto; Superbred; Telefoto; Telefotozoom; Tilt-shift; Ultra-telefotozoom; Ultrabred; Bred; Vidvinkelmakro; Bredt fisheye; Bred zoom; Annet
sv: Typ av kameraobjektiv: Bio; Förlängare; Fisheye; Fast fokus; Macro; Makrotelefoto; Standard; Standardzoom; Supertelefoto; Supervid; Telefoto; Telefotozoom; Luta-skifta; Ultratelefotozoom; Ultravid; Vid; Vidvinkelmakro; Vid fisheye; Vid zoom; Övrigt
cs: Typ objektivu fotoaparátu: Kino; Extender; Rybí oko; Pevné zaostření; Makro; Makro teleobjektiv; Standardní; Standardní zoom; Super teleobjektiv; Super široký; Teleobjektiv; Teleobjektiv se zoomem; Změna náklonu; Ultra-teleobjektiv se zoomem; Ultra široký; Široké; Širokoúhlé makro; Široké rybí oko; Široký zoom; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип обектив на камерата: Кино; Удължител; Рибешко око; Фиксиран фокус; Макро; Макро телеобектив; Стандартен; Стандартно увеличение; Супер телеобектив; Супер широкоъгълен; Телеобектив; Телефото увеличение; Тилт-шифт; Ултрателефото увеличение; Ултраширокоъгълен; Широкоъгълен; Широкоъгълен макро; Широкоъгълен рибешко око; Широко увеличение; Други
sk-SK: Typ objektívu fotoaparátu: Kino; Nástavec; Rybie oko; Pevné zaostrenie; Makro; Makro teleobjektív; Štandardný; Štandardné priblíženie; Super teleobjektív; Super široký; Teleobjektív; Zoom teleobjektívu; Efekt Tilt-shift s nízkou hĺbkou ostrosti; Ultra-teleobjektív so zoomom; Ultra-široký; Široký; Makro so širokým uhlom; Široké rybie oko; Široký zoom; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta objektiva fotoaparata/videokamere: Kinematski; Extender; Riblje oko; Fiksni fokus; Makro; Makro telefoto; Standardni; Standardni sa zumom; Super telefoto; Posebno široki; Telefoto; Telefoto sa zumom; Objektiv s nagibom i pomakom; Ultra-telefoto sa zumom; Ultra široki; Široki; Širokokutni makro; Širokokutni s ribljim okom; Širokokutni sa zumom; Ostalo
fi: Kameran objektiivityyppi: Elokuva; Laajentaja; Kalansilmä; Kiinteä tarkennus; Makro; Makro telefoto; Tavallinen; Standardi zoom; Super telefoto; Super leveä; Telefoto; Telefoto zoom; Tilt-shift; Ultra-telefoto zoom; Ultra-leveä; Leveä; Laajakulma makro; Laaja kalansilmä; Laaja zoom; Muu
ru: Тип объектива камеры: Кино; Расширитель; Рыбий глаз; Фиксированный фокус; Макро; Макро телефото; Стандартный; Стандартный зум; Супертелефото; Очень широкий; Телефото; Телефото зум; Наклон-сдвиг; Ультрателефото зум; Сверхширокий; Широкий; Широкоугольная макросъемка; Широкоугольный рыбий глаз; Широкоугольный зум; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de lente de câmera: Cinema; Extensor; Olho de peixe; Foco fixo; Macro; Telefoto macro; Padrão; Zoom padrão; Supertelefoto; Superampla; Telefoto; Zoom telefoto; Mudança de inclinação; Zoom ultratelefoto; Ultra-amplo; Largo; Macro grande angular; Olho de peixe largo; Amplo zoom; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de lente de câmara: Cinema; Extensor; Olho de peixe; Foco fixo; Macro; Telefoto macro; Padrão; Zoom padrão; Supertelefoto; Superamplo; Telefoto; Zoom telefoto; Tilt-shift; Zoom ultratelefoto; Ultra-ampla; Largo; Macro amplo angular; Olho de peixe amplo; Zoom amplo; Outro
el: Τύπος φακού κάμερας: Κινηματογραφικός; Μετατροπέας τηλεφακών; Fisheye; Σταθερής εστίασης; Macro; Macro τηλεφακός; Κανονικό; Τυπικός ζουμ; Σούπερ τηλεφακός; Σούπερ ευρυγώνιος; Τηλεφακός; Τηλεφακός ζουμ; Tilt-shift; Ultra τηλεφακός ζουμ; Υπερευρυγώνιος; Ευρυγώνιος; Ευρυγώνιος macro; Ευρυγώνιος fish-eye; Ευρυγώνιος ζουμ; Άλλο
tr: Kamera lensi türü: Sinema; Uzatıcı; Balık gözü; Sabit odak; Makro; Makro telefoto; Standart; Standart yakınlaştırma; Süper telefoto; Süper geniş; Telefoto; Telefoto yakınlaştırma; Tilt-shift; Ultra telefoto yakınlaştırma; Ultra geniş; Geniş; Geniş açılı makro; Geniş balık gözü; Geniş yakınlaştırma; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip obiectiv aparat foto: Cinema; Extender; Fisheye; Focalizare fixă; Macro; Macro telephoto; Standard; Standard zoom; Super telephoto; Super wide; Telephoto; Telephoto zoom; Înclinare-deplasare; Ultra-telephoto zoom; Ultra-wide; Wide; Macro cu unghi larg; Wide fish-eye; Zoom larg; Altele
fr: Type d’objectif d’appareil photo: Cinéma; Extension AV; Œil de poisson; Mise au point fixe; Macro; Téléobjectif macro; Standard; Zoom standard; Super téléobjectif; Super large; Super téléobjectif; Zoom téléobjectif; Inclinaison-décalage; Zoom ultra-téléobjectif; Ultra-large; Large; Macro grand angle; Large œil de poisson; Zoom large; Autre
ko: 카메라 렌즈 종류: 시네마; 확장기; 어안; 고정 초점; 매크로; 매크로 망원; 표준; 표준 줌; 초망원; 초광각; 망원; 망원 줌; 틸트 시프트; 초망원 줌; 초광각; 넓음; 광각 매크로; 광각 어안; 광각 줌; 기타
zh-TW: 相機鏡頭類型: 電影; 增距; 魚眼; 定焦; 微距; 微距長焦; 標準; 標準變焦; 超望遠長焦; 超廣角; 超望遠; 超望遠變焦; 移軸; 超遠攝變焦; 超寬廣角; 寬; 廣角微距; 寬魚眼; 廣角變焦; 其他
it: Tipo di obiettivo per fotocamera: Cinema; Ingrandente; Fisheye; Messa a fuoco fissa; Macro; Teleobiettivo macro; Standard; Zoom standard; Super telephoto; Super grandangolare; Telephoto; Teleobiettivo zoom; Tilt-shift; Zoom ultrateleobiettivo; Ultra grandangolare; Larga; Macro grandangolare; Fish-eye grandangolare; Zoom grandangolare; Altro
da: Kameraobjektivtype: Biograf; Forlænger; Fiskeøje; Fast fokus; Macro; Makro-telefoto; Standard; Standardzoom; Super-telefoto; Super bred; Telefoto; Telefoto-zoom; Tilt-skift; Ultra telefoto-zoom; Ultra bred; Bred; Vidvinkel makro; Bredt fiskeøje; Bred zoom; Andet
vi: Loại ống kính máy ảnh: Rạp chiếu phim; Bộ mở rộng; Mắt cá; Tiêu điểm cố định; Cận cảnh; Chụp ảnh xa chế độ cận cảnh; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Thu phóng tiêu chuẩn; Chụp ảnh siêu xa; Siêu rộng; Chụp ảnh xa; Thu phóng tiêu cự; Tilt-shift; Siêu thu phóng tiêu cự; Cực rộng; Rộng; Cận cảnh góc rộng; Mắt cá rộng; Thu phóng rộng; Khác
pl: Typ obiektywu aparatu: Kino; Wzmacniacz; Obiektyw „rybie oko”; Stała ogniskowa; Makro; Teleobiektyw makro; Standard; Standardowy zoom; Super teleobiektyw; Obiektyw super szerokokątny; Teleobiektyw; Teleobiektyw zmiennoogniskowy; Tilt-shift; Teleobiektyw ultra-zmiennoogniskowy; Obiektyw ultraszerokokątny; Szerokość; Obiektyw szerokokątny makro; Obiektyw szerokokątny „rybie oko”; Obiektyw szerokokątny o zmiennej ogniskowej; Inne
hu: Kamera lencséinek típusa: Cinema; Extender; Halszem; Rögzített fókusz; Makró; Makró telefotó; Normál; Normál zoom; Szuper telefotó; Szuperszéles látószögű; Telefotó; Telefotó zoom; Dönthető-eltolható; Ultra-telefotó zoom; Ultraszéles látószögű; Széles látószögű; Széles látószögű makró; Széles látószögű halszem; Széles zoom; Egyéb
ja: カメラレンズの種類: シネマ; エクステンダー; 魚眼レンズ; 固定焦点; マクロ; マクロ望遠; スタンダード; 標準ズーム; 超望遠; スーパーワイド; 望遠; 望遠ズーム; ティルトシフト; 超望遠ズーム; ウルトラワイド; ワイド; 広角マクロ; ワイド魚眼; ワイドズーム; その他
es: Tipo de objetivo para cámaras: Cine; Extensor; Ojo de pez; Foco fijo; Macro; Teleobjetivo macro; Estándar; Zoom estándar; Súperteleobjetivo; Gran angular; Teleobjetivo; Zoom de teleobjetivo; Desplazamiento basculante; Zoom ultrateleobjetivo; Ultra gran angular; Ancho; Gran angular macro; Ojo de pez gran angular; Zoom gran angular; Otros